Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-784
Coverage for childhood immunizations; requirements.

Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, any expense-incurred group sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed after January 1, 1995, or any expense-incurred individual sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or subscriber contract delivered or issued for delivery after such date that provides coverage for a dependent child under six years of age shall provide coverage for childhood immunizations. Benefits for childhood immunizations shall be exempt from any deductible provision contained in the applicable policy. Copayment, coinsurance, and dollar-limit provisions applicable to other medical services may be applied to the childhood immunization benefits. This section shall not apply to any individual or group policies that provide coverage for a specified disease, accident-only coverage, hospital indemnity coverage, medicare supplement coverage, long-term care coverage, or other limited-benefit coverage.

For purposes of this section, childhood immunizations shall mean the complete set of vaccinations for children from birth to six years of age for immunization against measles, mumps, rubella, poliomyelitis, diphtheria, pertussis, tetanus, and haemophilus influenzae type B.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 46;

Laws 2007, LB63, § 1.